trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="SP_ADB_ADOARR">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>SPCMS</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>SPS00</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="VS_ADI_SIN">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSG0000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIC1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIC1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIC2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIC2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIC3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIC3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIF1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIF1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIF2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIF2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIF3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIF3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSII1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSII1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSII2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSII2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSII3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSII3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIP1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIP1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIP2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIP2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIP3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIP3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIS1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIS1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIS2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIS2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIS3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSIS3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSM01P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSM02P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSM02S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSM03P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSM03S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSN0000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSP0000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSP00PF</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSP00PM</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSP00SF</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSP00SM</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>+[AMM][PART]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSF1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSF1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSF2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSF2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSF3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSF3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSI1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSI1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSI2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSI2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSI3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSI3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSP1P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSP1S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSP2P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSP2S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSP3P0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>VSSP3S0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADI][SIN]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>izan</l> 
        <r>ser</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="VS_ADI_SIN"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>versus</l> 
        <r>versus</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="SP_ADB_ADOARR"/> 
    </e>
